Hawaii statutes.
[PART IV.
OTHER EXPORTS]

§150A-31 Certificate for shipment. The
department may certify as to the pest condition of honey bee shipments when
health certificates are officially required. Fees to cover the department's
certification costs may be charged for health certificates as provided by rule
and shall be deposited into the pest inspection, quarantine, and eradication
fund. Health certificates shall not be altered or misused. [L 1996, c 111, §1;
am L 2010, c 173, §8]

Cross References

Home-based agriculturally
produced honey, see §§328-79, 80.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next